Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Right to Dissent and Obtain Payment for Shares

271B.13-010.
Definitions for subtitle.

As used in this subtitle:

“Corporation” means the issuer of the shares held by a dissenter, except that in the case of a merger where the issuing corporation is not the surviving corporation, then, after consummation of the merger, “corporation” shall mean the surviving corporation.

“Dissenter” means a shareholder who is entitled to dissent from corporate action under KRS

271B.13-020

and who exercises that right when and in the manner required by KRS

271B.13-200

to

271B.13-280

.

“Fair value,” with respect to a dissenter’s shares, means the value of the shares immediately before the effectuation of the corporate action to which the dissenter objects, excluding any appreciation or depreciation in anticipation of the corporate action unless exclusion would be inequitable. In any transaction subject to the requirements of KRS

271B.12-210

or exempted by KRS

271B.12-220

(2), “fair value” shall be at least an amount required to be paid under KRS

271B.12-220

(2) in order to be exempt from the requirements of KRS

271B.12-210

.

“Interest” means interest from the effective date of the corporate action until the date of payment, at the average rate currently paid by the corporation on its principal bank loans or, if none, at a rate that is fair and equitable under all the circumstances.

“Record shareholder” means the person in whose name shares are registered in the records of a corporation or the beneficial owner of shares to the extent of the rights granted by a nominee certificate on file with a corporation.

“Beneficial shareholder” means the person who is a beneficial owner of shares held in a voting trust or by a nominee as the record shareholder.

“Shareholder” means the record shareholder or the beneficial shareholder.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 123, effective January 1, 1989; 1998, ch. 341, § 9, effective July 15, 1998.

271B.13-020.
Right to dissent.

A shareholder shall be entitled to dissent from, and obtain payment of the fair value of his shares in the event of, any of the following corporate actions:

Consummation of a plan of merger to which the corporation is a party:

If shareholder approval is required for the merger by KRS

271B.11-030

or the articles of incorporation and the shareholder is entitled to vote on the merger; or

If the corporation is a subsidiary that is merged with its parent under KRS

271B.11-040

;

Consummation of a plan of share exchange to which the corporation is a party as the corporation whose shares will be acquired, if the shareholder is entitled to vote on the plan;

Consummation of a sale or exchange of all, or substantially all, of the property of the corporation other than in the usual and regular course of business, if the shareholder is entitled to vote on the sale or exchange, including a sale in dissolution but not including a sale pursuant to court order or a sale for cash pursuant to a plan by which all or substantially all of the net proceeds of the sale will be distributed to the shareholders within one (1) year after the date of sale;

Consummation of a plan of conversion of the corporation into a limited liability company or statutory trust;

An amendment of the articles of incorporation that materially and adversely affects rights in respect of a dissenter’s shares because it:

Alters or abolishes a preferential right of the shares to a distribution or in dissolution;

Creates, alters, or abolishes a right in respect of redemption, including a provision respecting a sinking fund for the redemption or repurchase of the shares;

Excludes or limits the right of the shares to vote on any matter other than a limitation by dilution through issuance of shares or other securities with similar voting rights;

Reduces the number of shares owned by the shareholder to a fraction of a share, if the fractional share so created is to be acquired for cash under KRS

271B.6-040

; or

In a public benefit corporation, changes the public benefit provisions;

Any transaction subject to the requirements of KRS

271B.12-210

or exempted by KRS

271B.12-220

(2);

Any election by a corporation to become a public benefit corporation or pursuant to the merger of a corporation with and into a public benefit corporation; or

Any corporate action taken pursuant to a shareholder vote to the extent the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a resolution of the board of directors provides that voting or nonvoting shareholders are entitled to dissent and obtain payment for their shares.

A shareholder entitled to dissent and obtain payment for his shares under this chapter shall not challenge the corporate action creating his entitlement except by an application for injunctive relief prior to the consummation of the corporate action.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, §
124, effective January 1, 1989; 2007, ch. 137, §
67, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
67, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 81, § 93, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 81, § 93, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 34, § 11, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 28, § 8, effective June 29, 2017.

271B.13-030.
Dissent by nominees and beneficial owners.

A record shareholder may assert dissenters’ rights as to fewer than all the shares registered in his name only if he shall dissent with respect to all shares beneficially owned by any one (1) person and notify the corporation in writing of the name and address of each person on whose behalf he asserts dissenters’ rights. The rights of a partial dissenter under this subsection shall be determined as if the shares as to which he dissents and his other shares were registered in the names of different shareholders.

A beneficial shareholder may assert dissenters’ rights as to shares held on his behalf only if:

He submits to the corporation the record shareholder’s written consent to the dissent not later than the time the beneficial shareholder asserts dissenters’ rights; and

He does so with respect to all shares of which he is the beneficial shareholder or over which he has power to direct the vote.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 125, effective January 1, 1989.